Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.902

Effective dates—2003 c 326.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2003, except for sections 4 and 10 of this act which take effect January 1, 2004.

[ 2003 c 326 s 93.]